test/src/morphology/V-hirnma85_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `hirnma: # Verb (85) `hirnma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `hirnma+V+Inf/mA: `hirnma
     `hirnma+V+Inf: `hirnuq
     `hirnma+V+ActPrtPrc: `hirnnuq
     `hirnma+V+PssPrtPrc: hirnut
     `hirnma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: hirnu
     `hirnma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: hirn
     `hirnma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [hirni, hirnõ, `hirnsõ]
     `hirnma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [hirñ, `hirnõ, `hirnsõ]
